Washington, session 2025-2026, HB1183.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 36.70A RCW to read as follows:(1) A city or county planning under RCW 36.70A.040 must allow for the following:(a) For retrofits of existing buildings to be used for residential housing:(i) The portion of exterior wall assemblies that includes insulation must be allowed to project up to an additional eight inches into the setbacks on all sides;(ii) The building must be allowed to exceed the maximum allowable roof height by eight inches to accommodate additional insulation; and(iii) Gross floor area must be measured from the interior face of the exterior walls, which includes drywall, as typically depicted on the architectural floor plans.(b) For existing nonconforming buildings already projecting into setbacks, the portion of exterior wall assemblies that include insulation must be allowed to project up to an additional eight inches into the setbacks on all sides if the building is to be used for residential housing.(2) Nothing in this section prohibits a city or county from applying the requirements of the state building code or requires a city or county to allow a setback of less than 36 inches between residential dwelling units.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 36.70A RCW to read as follows:(1) For new construction or the retrofit of existing buildings meeting passive house requirements, a city or county planning under RCW 36.70A.040 must allow for the following:(a) Any required setback must be measured to the outside face of the foundation, and the portion of exterior wall assemblies that include insulation must be allowed to project up to eight inches into setbacks on all sides;(b) The building must be allowed to exceed the maximum allowable roof height by eight inches to accommodate additional insulation; and(c) Gross floor area must be measured from the interior face of the exterior walls, which includes drywall, as typically depicted on the architectural floor plans.(2) For the purposes of this section, "passive house requirements" means the criteria for certification as a passive house by Phius or the international passive house institute.(3) Nothing in this section prohibits a city or county from applying the requirements of the state building code or requires a city or county to allow a setback of less than 36 inches between residential dwelling units.Sec. 3. RCW 35.21.990 and 2023 c 285 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:(1)(a) Cities must adopt or amend by ordinance, and incorporate into their development regulations, zoning regulations, and other official controls the requirements of subsection (2) of this section for buildings that are zoned for commercial or mixed use no later than six months after its next periodic comprehensive plan update required under RCW 36.70A.130.(b) The requirements of subsection (2) of this section apply and take effect in any city that has not adopted or amended ordinances, regulations, or other official controls as required under this section by the timeline in (a) of this subsection and supersede, preempt, and invalidate any conflicting local development regulations.(2) Through ordinances, development regulations, zoning regulations, or other official controls as required under subsection (1) of this section, cities may not:(a) Impose a restriction on housing unit density that prevents the addition of housing units at a density up to 50 percent more than what is allowed in the underlying zone if constructed entirely within an existing building envelope in a building located within a zone that permits multifamily housing, provided that generally applicable health and safety standards, including but not limited to building code standards and fire and life safety standards, can be met within the building;(b) Impose parking requirements on the addition of dwelling units or living units added within an existing building, however, cities may require the retention of existing parking that is required to satisfy existing residential parking requirements under local laws and for nonresidential uses that remain after the new units are added;(c) With the exception of emergency housing and transitional housing uses, impose permitting requirements on the use of an existing building for residential purposes beyond those requirements generally applicable to all residential development within the building's zone;(d) Impose design standard requirements, including setbacks, lot coverage, and floor area ratio requirements, on the use of an existing building for residential purposes beyond those requirements generally applicable to all residential development within the building's zone, except as provided in sections 1 and 2 of this act;(e) Impose exterior design or architectural requirements on the residential use of an existing building beyond those necessary for health and safety of the use of the interior of the building or to preserve character-defining streetscapes, unless the building is a designated landmark or is within a historic district established through a local preservation ordinance;(f) Prohibit the addition of housing units in any specific part of a building except ground floor commercial or retail that is along a major pedestrian corridor as defined by each city, unless the addition of the units would violate applicable building codes or health and safety standards;(g) Require unchanged portions of an existing building used for residential purposes to meet the current energy code solely because of the addition of new dwelling units within the building, however, if any portion of an existing building is converted to new dwelling units, each of those new units must meet the requirements of the current energy code;(h) Deny a building permit application for the addition of housing units within an existing building due to nonconformity regarding parking, height, setbacks, elevator size for gurney transport, or modulation, unless the city official with decision-making authority makes written findings that the nonconformity is causing a significant detriment to the surrounding area; or(i) Require a transportation concurrency study under RCW 36.70A.070 or an environmental study under chapter 43.21C RCW based on the addition of residential units within an existing building.(3) Nothing in this section requires a city to approve a building permit application for the addition of housing units constructed entirely within an existing building envelope in a building located within a zone that permits multifamily housing in cases in which the building cannot satisfy life safety standards.(4) For the purpose of this section, "existing building" means a building that received a certificate of occupancy at least three years prior to the permit application to add housing units.Sec. 4. RCW 35A.21.440 and 2023 c 285 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:(1)(a) Code cities must adopt or amend by ordinance, and incorporate into their development regulations, zoning regulations, and other official controls the requirements of subsection (2) of this section for buildings that are zoned for commercial or mixed use no later than six months after its next periodic comprehensive plan update required under RCW 36.70A.130.(b) The requirements of subsection (2) of this section apply and take effect in any code city that has not adopted or amended ordinances, regulations, or other official controls as required under this section by the timeline in (a) of this subsection and supersede, preempt, and invalidate any conflicting local development regulations.(2) Through ordinances, development regulations, zoning regulations, or other official controls as required under subsection (1) of this section, code cities may not:(a) Impose a restriction on housing unit density that prevents the addition of housing units at a density up to 50 percent more than what is allowed in the underlying zone if constructed entirely within an existing building envelope in a building located within a zone that permits multifamily housing, provided that generally applicable health and safety standards, including but not limited to building code standards and fire and life safety standards, can be met within the building;(b) Impose parking requirements on the addition of dwelling units or living units added within an existing building, however, cities may require the retention of existing parking that is required to satisfy existing residential parking requirements under local laws and for nonresidential uses that remain after the new units are added;(c) With the exception of emergency housing and transitional housing uses, impose permitting requirements on the use of an existing building for residential purposes beyond those requirements generally applicable to all residential development within the building's zone;(d) Impose design standard requirements, including setbacks, lot coverage, and floor area ratio requirements, on the use of an existing building for residential purposes beyond those requirements generally applicable to all residential development within the building's zone, except as provided in sections 1 and 2 of this act;(e) Impose exterior design or architectural requirements on the residential use of an existing building beyond those necessary for health and safety of the use of the interior of the building or to preserve character-defining streetscapes, unless the building is a designated landmark or is within a historic district established through a local preservation ordinance;(f) Prohibit the addition of housing units in any specific part of a building except ground floor commercial or retail that is along a major pedestrian corridor as defined by the code city, unless the addition of the units would violate applicable building codes or health and safety standards;(g) Require unchanged portions of an existing building used for residential purposes to meet the current energy code solely because of the addition of new dwelling units within the building, however, if any portion of an existing building is converted to new dwelling units, each of those new units must meet the requirements of the current energy code;(h) Deny a building permit application for the addition of housing units within an existing building due to nonconformity regarding parking, height, setbacks, elevator size for gurney transport, or modulation, unless the code city official with decision-making authority makes written findings that the nonconformity is causing a significant detriment to the surrounding area; or(i) Require a transportation concurrency study under RCW 36.70A.070 or an environmental study under chapter 43.21C RCW based on the addition of residential units within an existing building.(3) Nothing in this section requires a code city to approve a building permit application for the addition of housing units constructed entirely within an existing building envelope in a building located within a zone that permits multifamily housing in cases in which the building cannot satisfy life safety standards.(4) For the purpose of this section, "existing building" means a building that received a certificate of occupancy at least three years prior to the permit application to add housing units.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 5. A new section is added to chapter 36.70A RCW to read as follows:(1) A city or county planning under RCW 36.70A.040 must allow a building to exceed any maximum allowable roof height limits by at least 48 inches to accommodate a roof-mounted solar energy panel.(2) For purposes of this section, "solar energy panel" means a panel device or system or combination of panel devices or systems that relies on direct sunlight as an energy source, including a panel device or system or combination of panel devices or systems that collects sunlight for use in:(a) The heating or cooling of a structure or building;(b) The heating or pumping of water;(c) Industrial, commercial, or agricultural processes; or(d) The generation of electricity.(3) Nothing in this section prohibits a city or county from applying the requirements of the state building code or requires a city or county to allow a setback of less than 36 inches between residential dwelling units.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6. A new section is added to chapter 36.70A RCW to read as follows:(1) A city or county planning under RCW 36.70A.040 may not require faÃ§ade modulation or upper-level setbacks as a condition of permitting the following types of residential projects:(a) Affordable housing;(b) New construction meeting passive house requirements;(c) The retrofit of existing buildings meeting passive house requirements;(d) The conversion of existing buildings to housing or mixed-use development that includes housing;(e) Modular construction; or(f) Mass timber construction.(2) For the purposes of this section:(a) "FaÃ§ade modulation" means a change in building plane, either a recess or a projection, that changes the shape of the exterior massing of the building.(b) "Mass timber construction" means a building with structural components primarily made of mass timber products as defined in RCW 19.27.570.(c) "Modular construction" means a multistory residential or commercial building constructed of standardized components produced off-site, which are transported and assembled at a final location.(d) "Passive house requirements" means the criteria for certification as a passive house by Phius or the international passive house institute.(e) "Upper-level setback" means a required distance between the lot line and the building faÃ§ade applied only to portions of the building above a specified height.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 7. A new section is added to chapter 36.70A RCW to read as follows:(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, a city or county planning under RCW 36.70A.040 may not require off-street parking as a condition of permitting the following types of residential projects:(a) Affordable housing;(b) New construction or the retrofit of existing buildings meeting passive house requirements;(c) Modular construction; or(d) Mass timber construction.(2) A city or county may require off-street parking if the jurisdiction submits to the department of commerce an empirical study prepared by a credentialed transportation or land use planning expert that clearly demonstrates, and the department finds and certifies, that the application of the parking limitations in subsection (1) of this section will be significantly less safe for vehicle drivers or passengers, pedestrians, or bicyclists than if the jurisdiction's parking requirements were applied. The department must develop guidance to assist cities and counties on items to include in the study.(3) A county may require off-street parking if the county's roads are not developed to the standards for streets and roads adopted by the cities within that county.(4) For the purposes of this section:(a) "Mass timber construction" means a building with structural components primarily made of mass timber products as defined in RCW 19.27.570.(b) "Modular construction" means a multistory residential building constructed of standardized components produced off-site, which are transported and assembled at a final location.(c) "Passive house requirements" means the criteria for certification as a passive house by Phius or the international passive house institute.Sec. 8. RCW 36.70A.620 and 2020 c 173 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:In counties and cities planning under RCW 36.70A.040, minimum residential parking requirements mandated by municipal zoning ordinances for housing units constructed after July 1, 2019, are subject to the following requirements:(1) ((For housing units that are affordable to very low-income or extremely low-income individuals and that are located within one-quarter mile of a transit stop that receives transit service at least two times per hour for twelve or more hours per day, minimum residential parking requirements may be no greater than one parking space per bedroom or .75 space per unit. A city may require a developer to record a covenant that prohibits the rental of a unit subject to this parking restriction for any purpose other than providing for housing for very low-income or extremely low-income individuals. The covenant must address price restrictions and household income limits and policies if the property is converted to a use other than for low-income housing. A city may establish a requirement for the provision of more than one parking space per bedroom or .75 space per unit if the jurisdiction has determined a particular housing unit to be in an area with a lack of access to street parking capacity, physical space impediments, or other reasons supported by evidence that would make on-street parking infeasible for the unit.(2))) For housing units that are specifically for seniors or people with disabilities, that are located within one-quarter mile of a transit stop that receives transit service at least four times per hour for twelve or more hours per day, a city may not impose minimum residential parking requirements for the residents of such housing units, subject to the exceptions provided in this subsection. A city may establish parking requirements for staff and visitors of such housing units. A city may establish a requirement for the provision of one or more parking space per bedroom if the jurisdiction has determined a particular housing unit to be in an area with a lack of access to street parking capacity, physical space impediments, or other reasons supported by evidence that would make on-street parking infeasible for the unit. A city may require a developer to record a covenant that prohibits the rental of a unit subject to this parking restriction for any purpose other than providing for housing for seniors or people with disabilities.(((3)))(2) For market rate multifamily housing units that are located within one-quarter mile of a transit stop that receives transit service from at least one route that provides service at least four times per hour for twelve or more hours per day, minimum residential parking requirements may be no greater than one parking space per bedroom or .75 space per unit. A city or county may establish a requirement for the provision of more than one parking space per bedroom or .75 space per unit if the jurisdiction has determined a particular housing unit to be in an area with a lack of access to street parking capacity, physical space impediments, or other reasons supported by evidence that would make on-street parking infeasible for the unit.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 9. A new section is added to chapter 36.70A RCW to read as follows:(1) Cities and counties planning under RCW 36.70A.040 may not require affordable housing units for low-income or very low-income households, regardless of the unit mix and size of the project, to exceed the following sizes:(a) 400 square feet for a studio unit;(b) 550 square feet for a one-bedroom unit;(c) 750 square feet for a two-bedroom unit; and(d) 1,000 square feet for a three-bedroom unit.(2) If the average unit size in the project is smaller than the size requirements in this section, the city must allow the affordable housing units to be of a comparable size as the market rate units.(3) Co-living housing units are subject to the provisions of RCW 36.70A.535.(4) This section does not apply to low-income housing developed under an affordable housing incentive program as provided in RCW 36.70A.540.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 10. A new section is added to chapter 36.70A RCW to read as follows:Cities and counties that plan under the growth management act must adopt or amend by ordinance, and incorporate into their development regulations, zoning regulations, and other official controls, the requirements of sections 1, 2, 5 through 7, and 9 of this act by the sooner of six months after their next periodic comprehensive plan update or six months after their next implementation progress report.--- END ---